hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX x N 51
SFX x бу п [аоуұыэ]бу sf:п:2
SFX x бу п [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:п:2
SFX x гу к [аоуұыэ]гу sf:к:2
SFX x ғу қ [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:қ:2
SFX x гу к [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:к:2
SFX x ғу қ [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:қ:2
SFX x ду т [аоуұыэ]ду sf:т:2
SFX x ду т [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:т:2
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]му
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]су
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]у
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX x ю й [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]ю sf:й:1
SFX Y N 52
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:іңдер:1
SFX Y у ңдар [аоуұыэ]у sf:ңдар:1
SFX Y у ңдер [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:ңдер:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]бу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ву sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]жу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]зу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ку sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]қу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]лу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]му sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ну sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]һу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]пу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ру sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]су sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ту sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]фу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ху sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]цу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]чу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]шу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]щу sf:ыңдар:1
SFX Y ю йіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йіңдер:1
SFX Y ю йыңдар [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йыңдар:1
SFX y N 52
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:іңіз:1
SFX y у ңіз [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:ңіз:1
SFX y у ңыз [аоуұыэ]у sf:ңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]бу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ву sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]жу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]зу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ку sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]қу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]лу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]му sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ну sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]һу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]пу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ру sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]су sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ту sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]фу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ху sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]цу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]чу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]шу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]щу sf:ыңыз:1
SFX y ю йіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йіңіз:1
SFX y ю йыңыз [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йыңыз:1
SFX Z N 52
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]бу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ву sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]гу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ду sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]жу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]зу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ку sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]қу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]лу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]му sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ну sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]һу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]пу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ру sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]су sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ту sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]фу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ху sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]цу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]чу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]шу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]щу sf:іңіздер:1
SFX Z у ңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:ңіздер:1
SFX Z у ңыздар [аоуұыэ]у sf:ңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]бу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ву sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]гу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ғу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ду sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]жу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]зу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ку sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]қу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]лу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]му sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ну sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ңу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]һу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]пу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ру sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]су sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ту sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]фу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ху sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]цу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]чу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]шу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]щу sf:ыңыздар:1
SFX Z ю йіңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ю sf:йіңіздер:1
SFX Z ю йыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ю sf:йыңыздар:1
