hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
азулау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
актілеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
алшаю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
арамсояу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
арқаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
атысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ахау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ағызу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
аңқаю/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
балау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
баспаналау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
баурау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бебеулеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
белбау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
биттеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
борбайлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
брошюралау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
былдырлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
білгірсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бүйірлену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұзу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұлғалақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бұғау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
бөлектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дабдырлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дауыстау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дискілеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дырду/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
дәлелдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
езгу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
еліктіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ернеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
еңбектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жайнау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жалпақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жамығу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жарлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жаңғырту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жетеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жору/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жүйелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
жәрдемдесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
зерлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
зіркілдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
итию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кебіндеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кекештену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кенеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кестелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кимелеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
кінәлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күдістену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күмпілдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
күртілдеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көктеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
көпсіну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
латындандыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
майлату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
малаласу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мамырлану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
марғу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
маңайлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мейірімсіздеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
меңіреулеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
молайту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мінгізу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
мұқау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
нәзіктеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
опырылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
оқтану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
растаттыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сайқымазақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сарқырау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
секектеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сиқырлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
суалу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сындыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сілкілеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
сұмдану/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тайыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тарту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тобарсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
толқыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
торсықтату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тоқсыру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыйылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тыртақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тігілу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түзетітісу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түйіршіктелу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
түрту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұзақталу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
тұсату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төбелесу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
төселу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
формалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шайысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шалқиысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шарласу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шашалу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шаңыту/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шеткейлеу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шойқаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шоқшию/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шықырлау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
шөгу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ысылу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
іртіктену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қаймақшу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қалқақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарату/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қарысу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қатқақтау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қағлездену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қиралаңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қожыраңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қонғызу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қосымшалау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қуыну/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
қысау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құжыңдау/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
құрдассу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үйретілу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
үскілету/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
ұлықсу/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
әдепсіздену/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
өлтіру/MmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZz
